Utah statutes.
26A-1-106.   Assistance in establishing local departments -- Monitoring and standards of performance -- Responsibilities.

(1) (a)  By request of county governing bodies, the department may assist in the establishment of a local health department.

(b)  The department shall monitor the effort of the local health department to protect and promote the health of the public.

(c)  The department shall establish by rule minimum performance standards for basic programs of public health administration, personal health, laboratory services, health resources, and other preventive health programs not in conflict with state law as it finds necessary or desirable for the protection of the public health.

(d)  The department may by contract provide:

(i)  funds to assist a local health department if local resources are inadequate; and

(ii)  assistance to achieve the purposes of this part.

(2)  Regulations or standards relating to public health or environmental health services adopted or established by a local health department may not be less restrictive than department rules.

(3)  Local health departments are responsible within their boundaries for providing, directly or indirectly, basic public health services that include:

(a)  public health administration and support services;

(b)  maternal and child health;

(c)  communicable disease control, surveillance, and epidemiology;

(d)  food protection;

(e)  solid waste management;

(f)  waste water management; and

(g)  safe drinking water management.

(4)  The Department of Environmental Quality shall establish by rule minimum performance standards, including standards for inspection and enforcement, for basic programs of environmental health, not inconsistent with law, as necessary or desirable for the protection of public health.

